Illinois, session 104th, SB1638.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Identification Act is amended by 5changing Section 5.2 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2630/5.2)7    Sec. 5.2. Expungement, sealing, and immediate sealing.8    (a) General Provisions.9        (1) Definitions. In this Act, words and phrases have 10    the meanings set forth in this subsection, except when a 11    particular context clearly requires a different meaning.12            (A) The following terms shall have the meanings 13        ascribed to them in the following Sections of the 14        Unified Code of Corrections:15                Business Offense, Section 5-1-2.16                Charge, Section 5-1-3.17                Court, Section 5-1-6.18                Defendant, Section 5-1-7.19                Felony, Section 5-1-9.20                Imprisonment, Section 5-1-10.21                Judgment, Section 5-1-12.22                Misdemeanor, Section 5-1-14.23                Offense, Section 5-1-15.  SB1638- 2 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1                Parole, Section 5-1-16.2                Petty Offense, Section 5-1-17.3                Probation, Section 5-1-18.4                Sentence, Section 5-1-19.5                Supervision, Section 5-1-21.6                Victim, Section 5-1-22.7            (B) As used in this Section, "charge not initiated 8        by arrest" means a charge (as defined by Section 5-1-3 9        of the Unified Code of Corrections) brought against a 10        defendant where the defendant is not arrested prior to 11        or as a direct result of the charge.12            (C) "Conviction" means a judgment of conviction or 13        sentence entered upon a plea of guilty or upon a 14        verdict or finding of guilty of an offense, rendered 15        by a legally constituted jury or by a court of 16        competent jurisdiction authorized to try the case 17        without a jury. An order of supervision successfully 18        completed by the petitioner is not a conviction. An 19        order of qualified probation (as defined in subsection 20        (a)(1)(J)) successfully completed by the petitioner is 21        not a conviction. An order of supervision or an order 22        of qualified probation that is terminated 23        unsatisfactorily is a conviction, unless the 24        unsatisfactory termination is reversed, vacated, or 25        modified and the judgment of conviction, if any, is 26        reversed or vacated.  SB1638- 3 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1            (D) "Criminal offense" means a petty offense, 2        business offense, misdemeanor, felony, arrest under 3        the Uniform Criminal Extradition Act, or municipal 4        ordinance violation (as defined in subsection 5        (a)(1)(H)). As used in this Section, a minor traffic 6        offense (as defined in subsection (a)(1)(G)) shall not 7        be considered a criminal offense.8            (E) "Expunge" means to physically destroy the 9        records or return them to the petitioner and to 10        obliterate the petitioner's name from any official 11        index or public record, or both. Nothing in this Act 12        shall require the physical destruction of the circuit 13        court file, but such records relating to arrests or 14        charges, or both, ordered expunged shall be impounded 15        as required by subsections (d)(9)(A)(ii) and 16        (d)(9)(B)(ii).17            (F) As used in this Section, "last sentence" means 18        the sentence, order of supervision, or order of 19        qualified probation (as defined by subsection 20        (a)(1)(J)), for a criminal offense (as defined by 21        subsection (a)(1)(D)) that terminates last in time in 22        any jurisdiction, regardless of whether the petitioner 23        has included the criminal offense for which the 24        sentence or order of supervision or qualified 25        probation was imposed in his or her petition. If 26        multiple sentences, orders of supervision, or orders   SB1638- 4 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        of qualified probation terminate on the same day and 2        are last in time, they shall be collectively 3        considered the "last sentence" regardless of whether 4        they were ordered to run concurrently.5            (G) "Minor traffic offense" means a petty offense, 6        business offense, or Class C misdemeanor under the 7        Illinois Vehicle Code or a similar provision of a 8        municipal or local ordinance.9            (G-5) "Minor Cannabis Offense" means a violation 10        of Section 4 or 5 of the Cannabis Control Act 11        concerning not more than 30 grams of any substance 12        containing cannabis, provided the violation did not 13        include a penalty enhancement under Section 7 of the 14        Cannabis Control Act and is not associated with an 15        arrest, conviction or other disposition for a violent 16        crime as defined in subsection (c) of Section 3 of the 17        Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act. 18            (H) "Municipal ordinance violation" means an 19        offense defined by a municipal or local ordinance that 20        is criminal in nature and with which the petitioner 21        was charged or for which the petitioner was arrested 22        and released without charging.23            (I) "Petitioner" means an adult or a minor 24        prosecuted as an adult who has applied for relief 25        under this Section.26            (J) "Qualified probation" means an order of   SB1638- 5 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        probation under Section 10 of the Cannabis Control 2        Act, Section 410 of the Illinois Controlled Substances 3        Act, Section 70 of the Methamphetamine Control and 4        Community Protection Act, Section 5-6-3.3 or 5-6-3.4 5        of the Unified Code of Corrections, Section 6        12-4.3(b)(1) and (2) of the Criminal Code of 1961 (as 7        those provisions existed before their deletion by 8        Public Act 89-313), Section 10-102 of the Illinois 9        Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act, Section 10        40-10 of the Substance Use Disorder Act, or Section 10 11        of the Steroid Control Act. For the purpose of this 12        Section, "successful completion" of an order of 13        qualified probation under Section 10-102 of the 14        Illinois Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act and 15        Section 40-10 of the Substance Use Disorder Act means 16        that the probation was terminated satisfactorily and 17        the judgment of conviction was vacated.18            (K) "Seal" means to physically and electronically 19        maintain the records, unless the records would 20        otherwise be destroyed due to age, but to make the 21        records unavailable without a court order, subject to 22        the exceptions in Sections 12 and 13 of this Act. The 23        petitioner's name shall also be obliterated from the 24        official index required to be kept by the circuit 25        court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts 26        Act, but any index issued by the circuit court clerk   SB1638- 6 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        before the entry of the order to seal shall not be 2        affected.3            (L) "Sexual offense committed against a minor" 4        includes, but is not limited to, the offenses of 5        indecent solicitation of a child or criminal sexual 6        abuse when the victim of such offense is under 18 years 7        of age.8            (M) "Terminate" as it relates to a sentence or 9        order of supervision or qualified probation includes 10        either satisfactory or unsatisfactory termination of 11        the sentence, unless otherwise specified in this 12        Section. A sentence is terminated notwithstanding any 13        outstanding financial legal obligation. 14        (2) Minor Traffic Offenses. Orders of supervision or 15    convictions for minor traffic offenses shall not affect a 16    petitioner's eligibility to expunge or seal records 17    pursuant to this Section.18        (2.5) Commencing 180 days after July 29, 2016 (the 19    effective date of Public Act 99-697), the law enforcement 20    agency issuing the citation shall automatically expunge, 21    on or before January 1 and July 1 of each year, the law 22    enforcement records of a person found to have committed a 23    civil law violation of subsection (a) of Section 4 of the 24    Cannabis Control Act or subsection (c) of Section 3.5 of 25    the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act in the law enforcement 26    agency's possession or control and which contains the   SB1638- 7 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    final satisfactory disposition which pertain to the person 2    issued a citation for that offense. The law enforcement 3    agency shall provide by rule the process for access, 4    review, and to confirm the automatic expungement by the 5    law enforcement agency issuing the citation. Commencing 6    180 days after July 29, 2016 (the effective date of Public 7    Act 99-697), the clerk of the circuit court shall expunge, 8    upon order of the court, or in the absence of a court order 9    on or before January 1 and July 1 of each year, the court 10    records of a person found in the circuit court to have 11    committed a civil law violation of subsection (a) of 12    Section 4 of the Cannabis Control Act or subsection (c) of 13    Section 3.5 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act in the 14    clerk's possession or control and which contains the final 15    satisfactory disposition which pertain to the person 16    issued a citation for any of those offenses. 17        (3) Exclusions. Except as otherwise provided in 18    subsections (b)(5), (b)(6), (b)(8), (e), (e-5), and (e-6) 19    of this Section, the court shall not order:20            (A) the sealing or expungement of the records of 21        arrests or charges not initiated by arrest that result 22        in an order of supervision for or conviction of: (i) 23        any sexual offense committed against a minor; (ii) 24        Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or a 25        similar provision of a local ordinance; or (iii) 26        Section 11-503 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or a   SB1638- 8 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        similar provision of a local ordinance, unless the 2        arrest or charge is for a misdemeanor violation of 3        subsection (a) of Section 11-503 or a similar 4        provision of a local ordinance, that occurred prior to 5        the offender reaching the age of 25 years and the 6        offender has no other conviction for violating Section 7        11-501 or 11-503 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or a 8        similar provision of a local ordinance.9            (B) the sealing or expungement of records of minor 10        traffic offenses (as defined in subsection (a)(1)(G)), 11        unless the petitioner was arrested and released 12        without charging.13            (C) the sealing of the records of arrests or 14        charges not initiated by arrest which result in an 15        order of supervision or a conviction for the following 16        offenses:17                (i) offenses included in Article 11 of the 18            Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 19            or a similar provision of a local ordinance, 20            except Section 11-14 and a misdemeanor violation 21            of Section 11-30 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 22            the Criminal Code of 2012, or a similar provision 23            of a local ordinance;24                (ii) Section 11-1.50, 12-3.4, 12-15, 12-30, 25            26-5, or 48-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 26            Criminal Code of 2012, or a similar provision of a   SB1638- 9 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1            local ordinance;2                (iii) Section 12-3.1 or 12-3.2 of the Criminal 3            Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or 4            Section 125 of the Stalking No Contact Order Act, 5            or Section 219 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 6            or a similar provision of a local ordinance;7                (iv) Class A misdemeanors or felony offenses 8            under the Humane Care for Animals Act; or9                (v) any offense or attempted offense that 10            would subject a person to registration under the 11            Sex Offender Registration Act.12            (D) (blank).13    (b) Expungement.14        (1) A petitioner may petition the circuit court to 15    expunge the records of his or her arrests and charges not 16    initiated by arrest when each arrest or charge not 17    initiated by arrest sought to be expunged resulted in: (i) 18    acquittal, dismissal, or the petitioner's release without 19    charging, unless excluded by subsection (a)(3)(B); (ii) a 20    conviction which was vacated or reversed, unless excluded 21    by subsection (a)(3)(B); (iii) an order of supervision and 22    such supervision was successfully completed by the 23    petitioner, unless excluded by subsection (a)(3)(A) or 24    (a)(3)(B); or (iv) an order of qualified probation (as 25    defined in subsection (a)(1)(J)) and such probation was 26    successfully completed by the petitioner, or (v)   SB1638- 10 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    extradition to another state under the Uniform Criminal 2    Extradition Act.3        (1.5) When a petitioner seeks to have a record of 4    arrest expunged under this Section, and the offender has 5    been convicted of a criminal offense, the State's Attorney 6    may object to the expungement on the grounds that the 7    records contain specific relevant information aside from 8    the mere fact of the arrest. 9        (2) Time frame for filing a petition to expunge.10            (A) When the arrest or charge not initiated by 11        arrest sought to be expunged resulted in an acquittal, 12        dismissal, the petitioner's release without charging, 13        or the reversal or vacation of a conviction, there is 14        no waiting period to petition for the expungement of 15        such records.16            (A-5) In anticipation of the successful completion 17        of a problem-solving court, pre-plea diversion, or 18        post-plea diversion program, a petition for 19        expungement may be filed 61 days before the 20        anticipated dismissal of the case or any time 21        thereafter. Upon successful completion of the program 22        and dismissal of the case, the court shall review the 23        petition of the person graduating from the program and 24        shall grant expungement if the petitioner meets all 25        requirements as specified in any applicable statute. 26            (B) When the arrest or charge not initiated by   SB1638- 11 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        arrest sought to be expunged resulted in an order of 2        supervision, successfully completed by the petitioner, 3        the following time frames will apply:4                (i) Those arrests or charges that resulted in 5            orders of supervision under Section 3-707, 3-708, 6            3-710, or 5-401.3 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or 7            a similar provision of a local ordinance, or under 8            Section 11-1.50, 12-3.2, or 12-15 of the Criminal 9            Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or a 10            similar provision of a local ordinance, shall not 11            be eligible for expungement until 5 years have 12            passed following the satisfactory termination of 13            the supervision.14                (i-5) Those arrests or charges that resulted 15            in orders of supervision for a misdemeanor 16            violation of subsection (a) of Section 11-503 of 17            the Illinois Vehicle Code or a similar provision 18            of a local ordinance, that occurred prior to the 19            offender reaching the age of 25 years and the 20            offender has no other conviction for violating 21            Section 11-501 or 11-503 of the Illinois Vehicle 22            Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance 23            shall not be eligible for expungement until the 24            petitioner has reached the age of 25 years. 25                (ii) Those arrests or charges that resulted in 26            orders of supervision for any other offenses shall   SB1638- 12 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1            not be eligible for expungement until 2 years have 2            passed following the satisfactory termination of 3            the supervision.4            (C) When the arrest or charge not initiated by 5        arrest sought to be expunged resulted in an order of 6        qualified probation, successfully completed by the 7        petitioner, such records shall not be eligible for 8        expungement until 5 years have passed following the 9        satisfactory termination of the probation.10        (3) Those records maintained by the Illinois State 11    Police for persons arrested prior to their 17th birthday 12    shall be expunged as provided in Section 5-915 of the 13    Juvenile Court Act of 1987.14        (4) Whenever a person has been arrested for or 15    convicted of any offense, in the name of a person whose 16    identity he or she has stolen or otherwise come into 17    possession of, the aggrieved person from whom the identity 18    was stolen or otherwise obtained without authorization, 19    upon learning of the person having been arrested using his 20    or her identity, may, upon verified petition to the chief 21    judge of the circuit wherein the arrest was made, have a 22    court order entered nunc pro tunc by the Chief Judge to 23    correct the arrest record, conviction record, if any, and 24    all official records of the arresting authority, the 25    Illinois State Police, other criminal justice agencies, 26    the prosecutor, and the trial court concerning such   SB1638- 13 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    arrest, if any, by removing his or her name from all such 2    records in connection with the arrest and conviction, if 3    any, and by inserting in the records the name of the 4    offender, if known or ascertainable, in lieu of the 5    aggrieved's name. The records of the circuit court clerk 6    shall be sealed until further order of the court upon good 7    cause shown and the name of the aggrieved person 8    obliterated on the official index required to be kept by 9    the circuit court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of 10    Courts Act, but the order shall not affect any index 11    issued by the circuit court clerk before the entry of the 12    order. Nothing in this Section shall limit the Illinois 13    State Police or other criminal justice agencies or 14    prosecutors from listing under an offender's name the 15    false names he or she has used.16        (5) Whenever a person has been convicted of criminal 17    sexual assault, aggravated criminal sexual assault, 18    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, criminal 19    sexual abuse, or aggravated criminal sexual abuse, the 20    victim of that offense may request that the State's 21    Attorney of the county in which the conviction occurred 22    file a verified petition with the presiding trial judge at 23    the petitioner's trial to have a court order entered to 24    seal the records of the circuit court clerk in connection 25    with the proceedings of the trial court concerning that 26    offense. However, the records of the arresting authority   SB1638- 14 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    and the Illinois State Police concerning the offense shall 2    not be sealed. The court, upon good cause shown, shall 3    make the records of the circuit court clerk in connection 4    with the proceedings of the trial court concerning the 5    offense available for public inspection.6        (6) If a conviction has been set aside on direct 7    review or on collateral attack and the court determines by 8    clear and convincing evidence that the petitioner was 9    factually innocent of the charge, the court that finds the 10    petitioner factually innocent of the charge shall enter an 11    expungement order for the conviction for which the 12    petitioner has been determined to be innocent as provided 13    in subsection (b) of Section 5-5-4 of the Unified Code of 14    Corrections.15        (7) Nothing in this Section shall prevent the Illinois 16    State Police from maintaining all records of any person 17    who is admitted to probation upon terms and conditions and 18    who fulfills those terms and conditions pursuant to 19    Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the 20    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of the 21    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 22    Section 5-6-3.3 or 5-6-3.4 of the Unified Code of 23    Corrections, Section 12-4.3 or subdivision (b)(1) of 24    Section 12-3.05 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 25    Criminal Code of 2012, Section 10-102 of the Illinois 26    Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act, Section 40-10 of   SB1638- 15 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    the Substance Use Disorder Act, or Section 10 of the 2    Steroid Control Act.3        (8) If the petitioner has been granted a certificate 4    of innocence under Section 2-702 of the Code of Civil 5    Procedure, the court that grants the certificate of 6    innocence shall also enter an order expunging the 7    conviction for which the petitioner has been determined to 8    be innocent as provided in subsection (h) of Section 2-702 9    of the Code of Civil Procedure.10    (c) Sealing.11        (1) Applicability. Notwithstanding any other provision 12    of this Act to the contrary, and cumulative with any 13    rights to expungement of criminal records, this subsection 14    authorizes the sealing of criminal records of adults and 15    of minors prosecuted as adults. Subsection (g) of this 16    Section provides for immediate sealing of certain records. 17        (2) Eligible Records. The following records may be 18    sealed:19            (A) All arrests resulting in release without 20        charging;21            (B) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 22        resulting in acquittal, dismissal, or conviction when 23        the conviction was reversed or vacated, except as 24        excluded by subsection (a)(3)(B);25            (C) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 26        resulting in orders of supervision, including orders   SB1638- 16 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        of supervision for municipal ordinance violations, 2        successfully completed by the petitioner, unless 3        excluded by subsection (a)(3);4            (D) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 5        resulting in convictions, including convictions on 6        municipal ordinance violations, unless excluded by 7        subsection (a)(3);8            (E) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 9        resulting in orders of first offender probation under 10        Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of 11        the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of 12        the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection 13        Act, or Section 5-6-3.3 of the Unified Code of 14        Corrections; and15            (F) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 16        resulting in felony convictions unless otherwise 17        excluded by subsection (a) paragraph (3) of this 18        Section.19        (3) When Records Are Eligible to Be Sealed. Records 20    identified as eligible under subsection (c)(2) may be 21    sealed as follows:22            (A) Records identified as eligible under 23        subsections (c)(2)(A) and (c)(2)(B) may be sealed at 24        any time.25            (B) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph 26        (E) of this paragraph (3), records identified as   SB1638- 17 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        eligible under subsection (c)(2)(C) may be sealed 2 2        years after the termination of petitioner's last 3        sentence (as defined in subsection (a)(1)(F)).4            (C) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph 5        (E) of this paragraph (3), records identified as 6        eligible under subsections (c)(2)(D), (c)(2)(E), and 7        (c)(2)(F) may be sealed 3 years after the termination 8        of the petitioner's last sentence (as defined in 9        subsection (a)(1)(F)). Convictions requiring public 10        registration under the Arsonist Registry Act, the Sex 11        Offender Registration Act, or the Murderer and Violent 12        Offender Against Youth Registration Act may not be 13        sealed until the petitioner is no longer required to 14        register under that relevant Act.15            (D) Records identified in subsection 16        (a)(3)(A)(iii) may be sealed after the petitioner has 17        reached the age of 25 years. 18            (E) Records identified as eligible under 19        subsection (c)(2)(C), (c)(2)(D), (c)(2)(E), or 20        (c)(2)(F) may be sealed upon termination of the 21        petitioner's last sentence if the petitioner earned a 22        high school diploma, associate's degree, career 23        certificate, vocational technical certification, or 24        bachelor's degree, or passed the high school level 25        Test of General Educational Development, during the 26        period of his or her sentence or mandatory supervised   SB1638- 18 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        release. This subparagraph shall apply only to a 2        petitioner who has not completed the same educational 3        goal prior to the period of his or her sentence or 4        mandatory supervised release. If a petition for 5        sealing eligible records filed under this subparagraph 6        is denied by the court, the time periods under 7        subparagraph (B) or (C) shall apply to any subsequent 8        petition for sealing filed by the petitioner.9        (4) Subsequent felony convictions. A person may not 10    have subsequent felony conviction records sealed as 11    provided in this subsection (c) if he or she is convicted 12    of any felony offense after the date of the sealing of 13    prior felony convictions as provided in this subsection 14    (c). The court may, upon conviction for a subsequent 15    felony offense, order the unsealing of prior felony 16    conviction records previously ordered sealed by the court.17        (5) Notice of eligibility for sealing. Upon entry of a 18    disposition for an eligible record under this subsection 19    (c), the petitioner shall be informed by the court of the 20    right to have the records sealed and the procedures for 21    the sealing of the records.22    (d) Procedure. The following procedures apply to 23expungement under subsections (b), (e), and (e-6) and sealing 24under subsections (c) and (e-5):25        (1) Filing the petition. Upon becoming eligible to 26    petition for the expungement or sealing of records under   SB1638- 19 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    this Section, the petitioner shall file a petition 2    requesting the expungement or sealing of records with the 3    clerk of the court where the arrests occurred or the 4    charges were brought, or both. If arrests occurred or 5    charges were brought in multiple jurisdictions, a petition 6    must be filed in each such jurisdiction. The petitioner 7    shall pay the applicable fee, except no fee shall be 8    required if the petitioner has obtained a court order 9    waiving fees under Supreme Court Rule 298 or it is 10    otherwise waived.11        (1.5) County fee waiver pilot program. From August 9, 12    2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-306) through 13    December 31, 2020, in a county of 3,000,000 or more 14    inhabitants, no fee shall be required to be paid by a 15    petitioner if the records sought to be expunged or sealed 16    were arrests resulting in release without charging or 17    arrests or charges not initiated by arrest resulting in 18    acquittal, dismissal, or conviction when the conviction 19    was reversed or vacated, unless excluded by subsection 20    (a)(3)(B). The provisions of this paragraph (1.5), other 21    than this sentence, are inoperative on and after January 22    1, 2022. 23        (2) Contents of petition. The petition shall be 24    verified and shall contain the petitioner's name, date of 25    birth, current address and, for each arrest or charge not 26    initiated by arrest sought to be sealed or expunged, the   SB1638- 20 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    case number, the date of arrest (if any), the identity of 2    the arresting authority, and such other information as the 3    court may require. During the pendency of the proceeding, 4    the petitioner shall promptly notify the circuit court 5    clerk of any change of his or her address. If the 6    petitioner has received a certificate of eligibility for 7    sealing from the Prisoner Review Board under paragraph 8    (10) of subsection (a) of Section 3-3-2 of the Unified 9    Code of Corrections, the certificate shall be attached to 10    the petition.11        (3) Drug test. The petitioner must attach to the 12    petition proof that the petitioner has taken within 30 13    days before the filing of the petition a test showing the 14    absence within his or her body of all illegal substances 15    as defined by the Illinois Controlled Substances Act and 16    the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act 17    if he or she is petitioning to:18            (A) seal felony records under clause (c)(2)(E);19            (B) seal felony records for a violation of the 20        Illinois Controlled Substances Act, the 21        Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 22        or the Cannabis Control Act under clause (c)(2)(F);23            (C) seal felony records under subsection (e-5); or 24            (D) expunge felony records of a qualified 25        probation under clause (b)(1)(iv).26        (4) Service of petition. The circuit court clerk shall   SB1638- 21 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    promptly serve a copy of the petition and documentation to 2    support the petition under subsection (e-5) or (e-6) on 3    the State's Attorney or prosecutor charged with the duty 4    of prosecuting the offense, the Illinois State Police, the 5    arresting agency and the chief legal officer of the unit 6    of local government effecting the arrest.7        (5) Objections.8            (A) Any party entitled to notice of the petition 9        may file an objection to the petition. All objections 10        shall be in writing, shall be filed with the circuit 11        court clerk, and shall state with specificity the 12        basis of the objection. Whenever a person who has been 13        convicted of an offense is granted a pardon by the 14        Governor which specifically authorizes expungement, an 15        objection to the petition may not be filed.16            (B) Objections to a petition to expunge or seal 17        must be filed within 60 days of the date of service of 18        the petition.19        (6) Entry of order.20            (A) The Chief Judge of the circuit wherein the 21        charge was brought, any judge of that circuit 22        designated by the Chief Judge, or in counties of less 23        than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the presiding trial judge 24        at the petitioner's trial, if any, shall rule on the 25        petition to expunge or seal as set forth in this 26        subsection (d)(6).  SB1638- 22 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1            (B) Unless the State's Attorney or prosecutor, the 2        Illinois State Police, the arresting agency, or the 3        chief legal officer files an objection to the petition 4        to expunge or seal within 60 days from the date of 5        service of the petition, the court shall enter an 6        order granting or denying the petition.7            (C) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 8        the court shall not deny a petition for sealing under 9        this Section because the petitioner has not satisfied 10        an outstanding legal financial obligation established, 11        imposed, or originated by a court, law enforcement 12        agency, or a municipal, State, county, or other unit 13        of local government, including, but not limited to, 14        any cost, assessment, fine, or fee nor shall the court 15        consider any such outstanding legal financial 16        obligation in ruling upon the petition. An outstanding 17        legal financial obligation does not include any court 18        ordered restitution to a victim under Section 5-5-6 of 19        the Unified Code of Corrections, unless the 20        restitution has been converted to a civil judgment. 21        Nothing in this subparagraph (C) waives, rescinds, or 22        abrogates a legal financial obligation or otherwise 23        eliminates or affects the right of the holder of any 24        financial obligation to pursue collection under 25        applicable federal, State, or local law. 26            (D) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,   SB1638- 23 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        the court shall not deny a petition to expunge or seal 2        under this Section because the petitioner has 3        submitted a drug test taken within 30 days before the 4        filing of the petition to expunge or seal that 5        indicates a positive test for the presence of cannabis 6        within the petitioner's body. In this subparagraph 7        (D), "cannabis" has the meaning ascribed to it in 8        Section 3 of the Cannabis Control Act. 9        (7) Hearings. If an objection is filed, the court 10    shall set a date for a hearing and notify the petitioner 11    and all parties entitled to notice of the petition of the 12    hearing date at least 30 days prior to the hearing. Prior 13    to the hearing, the State's Attorney shall consult with 14    the Illinois State Police as to the appropriateness of the 15    relief sought in the petition to expunge or seal. At the 16    hearing, the court shall hear evidence on whether the 17    petition should or should not be granted, and shall grant 18    or deny the petition to expunge or seal the records based 19    on the evidence presented at the hearing. The court may 20    consider the following:21            (A) the strength of the evidence supporting the 22        defendant's conviction; 23            (B) the reasons for retention of the conviction 24        records by the State; 25            (C) the petitioner's age, criminal record history, 26        and employment history;   SB1638- 24 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1            (D) the period of time between the petitioner's 2        arrest on the charge resulting in the conviction and 3        the filing of the petition under this Section; and 4            (E) the specific adverse consequences the 5        petitioner may be subject to if the petition is 6        denied. 7        (8) Service of order. After entering an order to 8    expunge or seal records, the court must provide copies of 9    the order to the Illinois State Police, in a form and 10    manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police, to the 11    petitioner, to the State's Attorney or prosecutor charged 12    with the duty of prosecuting the offense, to the arresting 13    agency, to the chief legal officer of the unit of local 14    government effecting the arrest, and to such other 15    criminal justice agencies as may be ordered by the court.16        (9) Implementation of order.17            (A) Upon entry of an order to expunge records 18        pursuant to subsection (b)(2)(A) or (b)(2)(B)(ii), or 19        both:20                (i) the records shall be expunged (as defined 21            in subsection (a)(1)(E)) by the arresting agency, 22            the Illinois State Police, and any other agency as 23            ordered by the court, within 60 days of the date of 24            service of the order, unless a motion to vacate, 25            modify, or reconsider the order is filed pursuant 26            to paragraph (12) of subsection (d) of this   SB1638- 25 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1            Section;2                (ii) the records of the circuit court clerk 3            shall be impounded until further order of the 4            court upon good cause shown and the name of the 5            petitioner obliterated on the official index 6            required to be kept by the circuit court clerk 7            under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts Act, but 8            the order shall not affect any index issued by the 9            circuit court clerk before the entry of the order; 10            and11                (iii) in response to an inquiry for expunged 12            records, the court, the Illinois State Police, or 13            the agency receiving such inquiry, shall reply as 14            it does in response to inquiries when no records 15            ever existed.16            (B) Upon entry of an order to expunge records 17        pursuant to subsection (b)(2)(B)(i) or (b)(2)(C), or 18        both:19                (i) the records shall be expunged (as defined 20            in subsection (a)(1)(E)) by the arresting agency 21            and any other agency as ordered by the court, 22            within 60 days of the date of service of the order, 23            unless a motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider 24            the order is filed pursuant to paragraph (12) of 25            subsection (d) of this Section;26                (ii) the records of the circuit court clerk   SB1638- 26 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1            shall be impounded until further order of the 2            court upon good cause shown and the name of the 3            petitioner obliterated on the official index 4            required to be kept by the circuit court clerk 5            under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts Act, but 6            the order shall not affect any index issued by the 7            circuit court clerk before the entry of the order;8                (iii) the records shall be impounded by the 9            Illinois State Police within 60 days of the date 10            of service of the order as ordered by the court, 11            unless a motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider 12            the order is filed pursuant to paragraph (12) of 13            subsection (d) of this Section;14                (iv) records impounded by the Illinois State 15            Police may be disseminated by the Illinois State 16            Police only as required by law or to the arresting 17            authority, the State's Attorney, and the court 18            upon a later arrest for the same or a similar 19            offense or for the purpose of sentencing for any 20            subsequent felony, and to the Department of 21            Corrections upon conviction for any offense; and22                (v) in response to an inquiry for such records 23            from anyone not authorized by law to access such 24            records, the court, the Illinois State Police, or 25            the agency receiving such inquiry shall reply as 26            it does in response to inquiries when no records   SB1638- 27 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1            ever existed.2            (B-5) Upon entry of an order to expunge records 3        under subsection (e-6):4                (i) the records shall be expunged (as defined 5            in subsection (a)(1)(E)) by the arresting agency 6            and any other agency as ordered by the court, 7            within 60 days of the date of service of the order, 8            unless a motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider 9            the order is filed under paragraph (12) of 10            subsection (d) of this Section;11                (ii) the records of the circuit court clerk 12            shall be impounded until further order of the 13            court upon good cause shown and the name of the 14            petitioner obliterated on the official index 15            required to be kept by the circuit court clerk 16            under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts Act, but 17            the order shall not affect any index issued by the 18            circuit court clerk before the entry of the order;19                (iii) the records shall be impounded by the 20            Illinois State Police within 60 days of the date 21            of service of the order as ordered by the court, 22            unless a motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider 23            the order is filed under paragraph (12) of 24            subsection (d) of this Section;25                (iv) records impounded by the Illinois State 26            Police may be disseminated by the Illinois State   SB1638- 28 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1            Police only as required by law or to the arresting 2            authority, the State's Attorney, and the court 3            upon a later arrest for the same or a similar 4            offense or for the purpose of sentencing for any 5            subsequent felony, and to the Department of 6            Corrections upon conviction for any offense; and7                (v) in response to an inquiry for these 8            records from anyone not authorized by law to 9            access the records, the court, the Illinois State 10            Police, or the agency receiving the inquiry shall 11            reply as it does in response to inquiries when no 12            records ever existed. 13            (C) Upon entry of an order to seal records under 14        subsection (c), the arresting agency, any other agency 15        as ordered by the court, the Illinois State Police, 16        and the court shall seal the records (as defined in 17        subsection (a)(1)(K)). In response to an inquiry for 18        such records, from anyone not authorized by law to 19        access such records, the court, the Illinois State 20        Police, or the agency receiving such inquiry shall 21        reply as it does in response to inquiries when no 22        records ever existed.23            (D) The Illinois State Police shall send written 24        notice to the petitioner of its compliance with each 25        order to expunge or seal records within 60 days of the 26        date of service of that order or, if a motion to   SB1638- 29 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        vacate, modify, or reconsider is filed, within 60 days 2        of service of the order resolving the motion, if that 3        order requires the Illinois State Police to expunge or 4        seal records. In the event of an appeal from the 5        circuit court order, the Illinois State Police shall 6        send written notice to the petitioner of its 7        compliance with an Appellate Court or Supreme Court 8        judgment to expunge or seal records within 60 days of 9        the issuance of the court's mandate. The notice is not 10        required while any motion to vacate, modify, or 11        reconsider, or any appeal or petition for 12        discretionary appellate review, is pending. 13            (E) Upon motion, the court may order that a sealed 14        judgment or other court record necessary to 15        demonstrate the amount of any legal financial 16        obligation due and owing be made available for the 17        limited purpose of collecting any legal financial 18        obligations owed by the petitioner that were 19        established, imposed, or originated in the criminal 20        proceeding for which those records have been sealed. 21        The records made available under this subparagraph (E) 22        shall not be entered into the official index required 23        to be kept by the circuit court clerk under Section 16 24        of the Clerks of Courts Act and shall be immediately 25        re-impounded upon the collection of the outstanding 26        financial obligations.   SB1638- 30 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1            (F) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 2        Section, a circuit court clerk may access a sealed 3        record for the limited purpose of collecting payment 4        for any legal financial obligations that were 5        established, imposed, or originated in the criminal 6        proceedings for which those records have been sealed. 7        (10) Fees. The Illinois State Police may charge the 8    petitioner a fee equivalent to the cost of processing any 9    order to expunge or seal records. Notwithstanding any 10    provision of the Clerks of Courts Act to the contrary, the 11    circuit court clerk may charge a fee equivalent to the 12    cost associated with the sealing or expungement of records 13    by the circuit court clerk. From the total filing fee 14    collected for the petition to seal or expunge, the circuit 15    court clerk shall deposit $10 into the Circuit Court Clerk 16    Operation and Administrative Fund, to be used to offset 17    the costs incurred by the circuit court clerk in 18    performing the additional duties required to serve the 19    petition to seal or expunge on all parties. The circuit 20    court clerk shall collect and remit the Illinois State 21    Police portion of the fee to the State Treasurer and it 22    shall be deposited in the State Police Services Fund. If 23    the record brought under an expungement petition was 24    previously sealed under this Section, the fee for the 25    expungement petition for that same record shall be waived. 26        (11) Final Order. No court order issued under the   SB1638- 31 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    expungement or sealing provisions of this Section shall 2    become final for purposes of appeal until 30 days after 3    service of the order on the petitioner and all parties 4    entitled to notice of the petition.5        (12) Motion to Vacate, Modify, or Reconsider. Under 6    Section 2-1203 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the 7    petitioner or any party entitled to notice may file a 8    motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider the order granting 9    or denying the petition to expunge or seal within 60 days 10    of service of the order. If filed more than 60 days after 11    service of the order, a petition to vacate, modify, or 12    reconsider shall comply with subsection (c) of Section 13    2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Upon filing of a 14    motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider, notice of the 15    motion shall be served upon the petitioner and all parties 16    entitled to notice of the petition. 17        (13) Effect of Order. An order granting a petition 18    under the expungement or sealing provisions of this 19    Section shall not be considered void because it fails to 20    comply with the provisions of this Section or because of 21    any error asserted in a motion to vacate, modify, or 22    reconsider. The circuit court retains jurisdiction to 23    determine whether the order is voidable and to vacate, 24    modify, or reconsider its terms based on a motion filed 25    under paragraph (12) of this subsection (d).26        (14) Compliance with Order Granting Petition to Seal   SB1638- 32 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    Records. Unless a court has entered a stay of an order 2    granting a petition to seal, all parties entitled to 3    notice of the petition must fully comply with the terms of 4    the order within 60 days of service of the order even if a 5    party is seeking relief from the order through a motion 6    filed under paragraph (12) of this subsection (d) or is 7    appealing the order.8        (15) Compliance with Order Granting Petition to 9    Expunge Records. While a party is seeking relief from the 10    order granting the petition to expunge through a motion 11    filed under paragraph (12) of this subsection (d) or is 12    appealing the order, and unless a court has entered a stay 13    of that order, the parties entitled to notice of the 14    petition must seal, but need not expunge, the records 15    until there is a final order on the motion for relief or, 16    in the case of an appeal, the issuance of that court's 17    mandate.18        (16) The changes to this subsection (d) made by Public 19    Act 98-163 apply to all petitions pending on August 5, 20    2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-163) and to all 21    orders ruling on a petition to expunge or seal on or after 22    August 5, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-163). 23    (e) Whenever a person who has been convicted of an offense 24is granted a pardon by the Governor which specifically 25authorizes expungement, he or she may, upon verified petition 26to the Chief Judge of the circuit where the person had been   SB1638- 33 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1convicted, any judge of the circuit designated by the Chief 2Judge, or in counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 3presiding trial judge at the defendant's trial, have a court 4order entered expunging the record of arrest from the official 5records of the arresting authority and order that the records 6of the circuit court clerk and the Illinois State Police be 7sealed until further order of the court upon good cause shown 8or as otherwise provided herein, and the name of the defendant 9obliterated from the official index requested to be kept by 10the circuit court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of 11Courts Act in connection with the arrest and conviction for 12the offense for which he or she had been pardoned but the order 13shall not affect any index issued by the circuit court clerk 14before the entry of the order. All records sealed by the 15Illinois State Police may be disseminated by the Illinois 16State Police only to the arresting authority, the State's 17Attorney, and the court upon a later arrest for the same or 18similar offense or for the purpose of sentencing for any 19subsequent felony. Upon conviction for any subsequent offense, 20the Department of Corrections shall have access to all sealed 21records of the Illinois State Police pertaining to that 22individual. Upon entry of the order of expungement, the 23circuit court clerk shall promptly mail a copy of the order to 24the person who was pardoned.25    (e-5) Whenever a person who has been convicted of an 26offense is granted a certificate of eligibility for sealing by   SB1638- 34 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1the Prisoner Review Board which specifically authorizes 2sealing, he or she may, upon verified petition to the Chief 3Judge of the circuit where the person had been convicted, any 4judge of the circuit designated by the Chief Judge, or in 5counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the presiding 6trial judge at the petitioner's trial, have a court order 7entered sealing the record of arrest from the official records 8of the arresting authority and order that the records of the 9circuit court clerk and the Illinois State Police be sealed 10until further order of the court upon good cause shown or as 11otherwise provided herein, and the name of the petitioner 12obliterated from the official index requested to be kept by 13the circuit court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of 14Courts Act in connection with the arrest and conviction for 15the offense for which he or she had been granted the 16certificate but the order shall not affect any index issued by 17the circuit court clerk before the entry of the order. All 18records sealed by the Illinois State Police may be 19disseminated by the Illinois State Police only as required by 20this Act or to the arresting authority, a law enforcement 21agency, the State's Attorney, and the court upon a later 22arrest for the same or similar offense or for the purpose of 23sentencing for any subsequent felony. Upon conviction for any 24subsequent offense, the Department of Corrections shall have 25access to all sealed records of the Illinois State Police 26pertaining to that individual. Upon entry of the order of   SB1638- 35 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1sealing, the circuit court clerk shall promptly mail a copy of 2the order to the person who was granted the certificate of 3eligibility for sealing. 4    (e-6) Whenever a person who has been convicted of an 5offense is granted a certificate of eligibility for 6expungement by the Prisoner Review Board which specifically 7authorizes expungement, he or she may, upon verified petition 8to the Chief Judge of the circuit where the person had been 9convicted, any judge of the circuit designated by the Chief 10Judge, or in counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 11presiding trial judge at the petitioner's trial, have a court 12order entered expunging the record of arrest from the official 13records of the arresting authority and order that the records 14of the circuit court clerk and the Illinois State Police be 15sealed until further order of the court upon good cause shown 16or as otherwise provided herein, and the name of the 17petitioner obliterated from the official index requested to be 18kept by the circuit court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks 19of Courts Act in connection with the arrest and conviction for 20the offense for which he or she had been granted the 21certificate but the order shall not affect any index issued by 22the circuit court clerk before the entry of the order. All 23records sealed by the Illinois State Police may be 24disseminated by the Illinois State Police only as required by 25this Act or to the arresting authority, a law enforcement 26agency, the State's Attorney, and the court upon a later   SB1638- 36 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1arrest for the same or similar offense or for the purpose of 2sentencing for any subsequent felony. Upon conviction for any 3subsequent offense, the Department of Corrections shall have 4access to all expunged records of the Illinois State Police 5pertaining to that individual. Upon entry of the order of 6expungement, the circuit court clerk shall promptly mail a 7copy of the order to the person who was granted the certificate 8of eligibility for expungement. 9    (f) Subject to available funding, the Illinois Department 10of Corrections shall conduct a study of the impact of sealing, 11especially on employment and recidivism rates, utilizing a 12random sample of those who apply for the sealing of their 13criminal records under Public Act 93-211. At the request of 14the Illinois Department of Corrections, records of the 15Illinois Department of Employment Security shall be utilized 16as appropriate to assist in the study. The study shall not 17disclose any data in a manner that would allow the 18identification of any particular individual or employing unit. 19The study shall be made available to the General Assembly no 20later than September 1, 2010.21    (g) Immediate Sealing.22        (1) Applicability. Notwithstanding any other provision 23    of this Act to the contrary, and cumulative with any 24    rights to expungement or sealing of criminal records, this 25    subsection authorizes the immediate sealing of criminal 26    records of adults and of minors prosecuted as adults.  SB1638- 37 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        (2) Eligible Records. Arrests or charges not initiated 2    by arrest resulting in acquittal or dismissal with 3    prejudice, except as excluded by subsection (a)(3)(B), 4    that occur on or after January 1, 2018 (the effective date 5    of Public Act 100-282), may be sealed immediately if the 6    petition is filed with the circuit court clerk on the same 7    day and during the same hearing in which the case is 8    disposed.9        (3) When Records are Eligible to be Immediately 10    Sealed. Eligible records under paragraph (2) of this 11    subsection (g) may be sealed immediately after entry of 12    the final disposition of a case, notwithstanding the 13    disposition of other charges in the same case.14        (4) Notice of Eligibility for Immediate Sealing. Upon 15    entry of a disposition for an eligible record under this 16    subsection (g), the defendant shall be informed by the 17    court of his or her right to have eligible records 18    immediately sealed and the procedure for the immediate 19    sealing of these records.20        (5) Procedure. The following procedures apply to 21    immediate sealing under this subsection (g).22            (A) Filing the Petition. Upon entry of the final 23        disposition of the case, the defendant's attorney may 24        immediately petition the court, on behalf of the 25        defendant, for immediate sealing of eligible records 26        under paragraph (2) of this subsection (g) that are   SB1638- 38 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        entered on or after January 1, 2018 (the effective 2        date of Public Act 100-282). The immediate sealing 3        petition may be filed with the circuit court clerk 4        during the hearing in which the final disposition of 5        the case is entered. If the defendant's attorney does 6        not file the petition for immediate sealing during the 7        hearing, the defendant may file a petition for sealing 8        at any time as authorized under subsection (c)(3)(A).9            (B) Contents of Petition. The immediate sealing 10        petition shall be verified and shall contain the 11        petitioner's name, date of birth, current address, and 12        for each eligible record, the case number, the date of 13        arrest if applicable, the identity of the arresting 14        authority if applicable, and other information as the 15        court may require.16            (C) Drug Test. The petitioner shall not be 17        required to attach proof that he or she has passed a 18        drug test.19            (D) Service of Petition. A copy of the petition 20        shall be served on the State's Attorney in open court. 21        The petitioner shall not be required to serve a copy of 22        the petition on any other agency.23            (E) Entry of Order. The presiding trial judge 24        shall enter an order granting or denying the petition 25        for immediate sealing during the hearing in which it 26        is filed. Petitions for immediate sealing shall be   SB1638- 39 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        ruled on in the same hearing in which the final 2        disposition of the case is entered.3            (F) Hearings. The court shall hear the petition 4        for immediate sealing on the same day and during the 5        same hearing in which the disposition is rendered.6            (G) Service of Order. An order to immediately seal 7        eligible records shall be served in conformance with 8        subsection (d)(8).9            (H) Implementation of Order. An order to 10        immediately seal records shall be implemented in 11        conformance with subsections (d)(9)(C) and (d)(9)(D).12            (I) Fees. The fee imposed by the circuit court 13        clerk and the Illinois State Police shall comply with 14        paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of this Section.15            (J) Final Order. No court order issued under this 16        subsection (g) shall become final for purposes of 17        appeal until 30 days after service of the order on the 18        petitioner and all parties entitled to service of the 19        order in conformance with subsection (d)(8).20            (K) Motion to Vacate, Modify, or Reconsider. Under 21        Section 2-1203 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the 22        petitioner, State's Attorney, or the Illinois State 23        Police may file a motion to vacate, modify, or 24        reconsider the order denying the petition to 25        immediately seal within 60 days of service of the 26        order. If filed more than 60 days after service of the   SB1638- 40 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        order, a petition to vacate, modify, or reconsider 2        shall comply with subsection (c) of Section 2-1401 of 3        the Code of Civil Procedure.4            (L) Effect of Order. An order granting an 5        immediate sealing petition shall not be considered 6        void because it fails to comply with the provisions of 7        this Section or because of an error asserted in a 8        motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider. The circuit 9        court retains jurisdiction to determine whether the 10        order is voidable, and to vacate, modify, or 11        reconsider its terms based on a motion filed under 12        subparagraph (L) of this subsection (g).13            (M) Compliance with Order Granting Petition to 14        Seal Records. Unless a court has entered a stay of an 15        order granting a petition to immediately seal, all 16        parties entitled to service of the order must fully 17        comply with the terms of the order within 60 days of 18        service of the order. 19    (h) Sealing or vacation and expungement of trafficking 20victims' crimes.21        (1) A trafficking victim, as defined by paragraph (10) 22    of subsection (a) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 23    2012, may petition for vacation and expungement or 24    immediate sealing of his or her criminal record upon the 25    completion of his or her last sentence if his or her 26    participation in the underlying offense was a result of   SB1638- 41 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    human trafficking under Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code 2    of 2012 or a severe form of trafficking under the federal 3    Trafficking Victims Protection Act. 4        (1.5) A petition under paragraph (1) shall be 5    prepared, signed, and filed in accordance with Supreme 6    Court Rule 9. The court may allow the petitioner to attend 7    any required hearing remotely in accordance with local 8    rules. The court may allow a petition to be filed under 9    seal if the public filing of the petition would constitute 10    a risk of harm to the petitioner.11        (2) A petitioner under this subsection (h), in 12    addition to the requirements provided under paragraph (4) 13    of subsection (d) of this Section, shall include in his or 14    her petition a clear and concise statement that: (A) he or 15    she was a victim of human trafficking at the time of the 16    offense; and (B) that his or her participation in the 17    offense was a result of human trafficking under Section 18    10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or a severe form of 19    trafficking under the federal Trafficking Victims 20    Protection Act. 21        (3) If an objection is filed alleging that the 22    petitioner is not entitled to vacation and expungement or 23    immediate sealing under this subsection (h), the court 24    shall conduct a hearing under paragraph (7) of subsection 25    (d) of this Section and the court shall determine whether 26    the petitioner is entitled to vacation and expungement or   SB1638- 42 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    immediate sealing under this subsection (h). A petitioner 2    is eligible for vacation and expungement or immediate 3    relief under this subsection (h) if he or she shows, by a 4    preponderance of the evidence, that: (A) he or she was a 5    victim of human trafficking at the time of the offense; 6    and (B) that his or her participation in the offense was a 7    result of human trafficking under Section 10-9 of the 8    Criminal Code of 2012 or a severe form of trafficking 9    under the federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act.10    (i) Minor Cannabis Offenses under the Cannabis Control 11Act.12        (1) Expungement of Arrest Records of Minor Cannabis 13    Offenses.14            (A) The Illinois State Police and all law 15        enforcement agencies within the State shall 16        automatically expunge all criminal history records of 17        an arrest, charge not initiated by arrest, order of 18        supervision, or order of qualified probation for a 19        Minor Cannabis Offense committed prior to June 25, 20        2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27) if:21                (i) One year or more has elapsed since the 22            date of the arrest or law enforcement interaction 23            documented in the records; and24                (ii) No criminal charges were filed relating 25            to the arrest or law enforcement interaction or 26            criminal charges were filed and subsequently   SB1638- 43 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1            dismissed or vacated or the arrestee was 2            acquitted.3            (B) If the law enforcement agency is unable to 4        verify satisfaction of condition (ii) in paragraph 5        (A), records that satisfy condition (i) in paragraph 6        (A) shall be automatically expunged.7            (C) Records shall be expunged by the law 8        enforcement agency under the following timelines:9                (i) Records created prior to June 25, 2019 10            (the effective date of Public Act 101-27), but on 11            or after January 1, 2013, shall be automatically 12            expunged prior to January 1, 2021;13                (ii) Records created prior to January 1, 2013, 14            but on or after January 1, 2000, shall be 15            automatically expunged prior to January 1, 2023;16                (iii) Records created prior to January 1, 2000 17            shall be automatically expunged prior to January 18            1, 2025.19            In response to an inquiry for expunged records, 20        the law enforcement agency receiving such inquiry 21        shall reply as it does in response to inquiries when no 22        records ever existed; however, it shall provide a 23        certificate of disposition or confirmation that the 24        record was expunged to the individual whose record was 25        expunged if such a record exists. 26            (D) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to   SB1638- 44 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        restrict or modify an individual's right to have that 2        individual's records expunged except as otherwise may 3        be provided in this Act, or diminish or abrogate any 4        rights or remedies otherwise available to the 5        individual.6        (2) Pardons Authorizing Expungement of Minor Cannabis 7    Offenses.8            (A) Upon June 25, 2019 (the effective date of 9        Public Act 101-27), the Department of State Police 10        shall review all criminal history record information 11        and identify all records that meet all of the 12        following criteria:13                (i) one or more convictions for a Minor 14            Cannabis Offense;15                (ii) the conviction identified in paragraph 16            (2)(A)(i) did not include a penalty enhancement 17            under Section 7 of the Cannabis Control Act; and18                (iii) the conviction identified in paragraph 19            (2)(A)(i) is not associated with a conviction for 20            a violent crime as defined in subsection (c) of 21            Section 3 of the Rights of Crime Victims and 22            Witnesses Act.23            (B) Within 180 days after June 25, 2019 (the 24        effective date of Public Act 101-27), the Department 25        of State Police shall notify the Prisoner Review Board 26        of all such records that meet the criteria established   SB1638- 45 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        in paragraph (2)(A).2                (i) The Prisoner Review Board shall notify the 3            State's Attorney of the county of conviction of 4            each record identified by State Police in 5            paragraph (2)(A) that is classified as a Class 4 6            felony. The State's Attorney may provide a written 7            objection to the Prisoner Review Board on the sole 8            basis that the record identified does not meet the 9            criteria established in paragraph (2)(A). Such an 10            objection must be filed within 60 days or by such 11            later date set by the Prisoner Review Board in the 12            notice after the State's Attorney received notice 13            from the Prisoner Review Board.14                (ii) In response to a written objection from a 15            State's Attorney, the Prisoner Review Board is 16            authorized to conduct a non-public hearing to 17            evaluate the information provided in the 18            objection.19                (iii) The Prisoner Review Board shall make a 20            confidential and privileged recommendation to the 21            Governor as to whether to grant a pardon 22            authorizing expungement for each of the records 23            identified by the Department of State Police as 24            described in paragraph (2)(A).25            (C) If an individual has been granted a pardon 26        authorizing expungement as described in this Section,   SB1638- 46 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        the Prisoner Review Board, through the Attorney 2        General, shall file a petition for expungement with 3        the Chief Judge of the circuit or any judge of the 4        circuit designated by the Chief Judge where the 5        individual had been convicted. Such petition may 6        include more than one individual. Whenever an 7        individual who has been convicted of an offense is 8        granted a pardon by the Governor that specifically 9        authorizes expungement, an objection to the petition 10        may not be filed. Petitions to expunge under this 11        subsection (i) may include more than one individual. 12        Within 90 days of the filing of such a petition, the 13        court shall enter an order expunging the records of 14        arrest from the official records of the arresting 15        authority and order that the records of the circuit 16        court clerk and the Illinois State Police be expunged 17        and the name of the defendant obliterated from the 18        official index requested to be kept by the circuit 19        court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts 20        Act in connection with the arrest and conviction for 21        the offense for which the individual had received a 22        pardon but the order shall not affect any index issued 23        by the circuit court clerk before the entry of the 24        order. Upon entry of the order of expungement, the 25        circuit court clerk shall promptly provide a copy of 26        the order and a certificate of disposition to the   SB1638- 47 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        individual who was pardoned to the individual's last 2        known address or by electronic means (if available) or 3        otherwise make it available to the individual upon 4        request.5            (D) Nothing in this Section is intended to 6        diminish or abrogate any rights or remedies otherwise 7        available to the individual.8        (3) Any individual may file a motion to vacate and 9    expunge a conviction for a misdemeanor or Class 4 felony 10    violation of Section 4 or Section 5 of the Cannabis 11    Control Act. Motions to vacate and expunge under this 12    subsection (i) may be filed with the circuit court, Chief 13    Judge of a judicial circuit or any judge of the circuit 14    designated by the Chief Judge. The circuit court clerk 15    shall promptly serve a copy of the motion to vacate and 16    expunge, and any supporting documentation, on the State's 17    Attorney or prosecutor charged with the duty of 18    prosecuting the offense. When considering such a motion to 19    vacate and expunge, a court shall consider the following: 20    the reasons to retain the records provided by law 21    enforcement, the petitioner's age, the petitioner's age at 22    the time of offense, the time since the conviction, and 23    the specific adverse consequences if denied. An individual 24    may file such a petition after the completion of any 25    non-financial sentence or non-financial condition imposed 26    by the conviction. Within 60 days of the filing of such   SB1638- 48 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    motion, a State's Attorney may file an objection to such a 2    petition along with supporting evidence. If a motion to 3    vacate and expunge is granted, the records shall be 4    expunged in accordance with subparagraphs (d)(8) and 5    (d)(9)(A) of this Section. An agency providing civil legal 6    aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public Interest 7    Attorney Assistance Act, assisting individuals seeking to 8    file a motion to vacate and expunge under this subsection 9    may file motions to vacate and expunge with the Chief 10    Judge of a judicial circuit or any judge of the circuit 11    designated by the Chief Judge, and the motion may include 12    more than one individual. Motions filed by an agency 13    providing civil legal aid concerning more than one 14    individual may be prepared, presented, and signed 15    electronically.16        (4) Any State's Attorney may file a motion to vacate 17    and expunge a conviction for a misdemeanor or Class 4 18    felony violation of Section 4 or Section 5 of the Cannabis 19    Control Act. Motions to vacate and expunge under this 20    subsection (i) may be filed with the circuit court, Chief 21    Judge of a judicial circuit or any judge of the circuit 22    designated by the Chief Judge, and may include more than 23    one individual. Motions filed by a State's Attorney 24    concerning more than one individual may be prepared, 25    presented, and signed electronically. When considering 26    such a motion to vacate and expunge, a court shall   SB1638- 49 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    consider the following: the reasons to retain the records 2    provided by law enforcement, the individual's age, the 3    individual's age at the time of offense, the time since 4    the conviction, and the specific adverse consequences if 5    denied. Upon entry of an order granting a motion to vacate 6    and expunge records pursuant to this Section, the State's 7    Attorney shall notify the Prisoner Review Board within 30 8    days. Upon entry of the order of expungement, the circuit 9    court clerk shall promptly provide a copy of the order and 10    a certificate of disposition to the individual whose 11    records will be expunged to the individual's last known 12    address or by electronic means (if available) or otherwise 13    make available to the individual upon request. If a motion 14    to vacate and expunge is granted, the records shall be 15    expunged in accordance with subparagraphs (d)(8) and 16    (d)(9)(A) of this Section.17        (5) In the public interest, the State's Attorney of a 18    county has standing to file motions to vacate and expunge 19    pursuant to this Section in the circuit court with 20    jurisdiction over the underlying conviction.21        (6) If a person is arrested for a Minor Cannabis 22    Offense as defined in this Section before June 25, 2019 23    (the effective date of Public Act 101-27) and the person's 24    case is still pending but a sentence has not been imposed, 25    the person may petition the court in which the charges are 26    pending for an order to summarily dismiss those charges   SB1638- 50 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    against him or her, and expunge all official records of 2    his or her arrest, plea, trial, conviction, incarceration, 3    supervision, or expungement. If the court determines, upon 4    review, that: (A) the person was arrested before June 25, 5    2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27) for an 6    offense that has been made eligible for expungement; (B) 7    the case is pending at the time; and (C) the person has not 8    been sentenced of the minor cannabis violation eligible 9    for expungement under this subsection, the court shall 10    consider the following: the reasons to retain the records 11    provided by law enforcement, the petitioner's age, the 12    petitioner's age at the time of offense, the time since 13    the conviction, and the specific adverse consequences if 14    denied. If a motion to dismiss and expunge is granted, the 15    records shall be expunged in accordance with subparagraph 16    (d)(9)(A) of this Section.17        (7) A person imprisoned solely as a result of one or 18    more convictions for Minor Cannabis Offenses under this 19    subsection (i) shall be released from incarceration upon 20    the issuance of an order under this subsection.21        (8) The Illinois State Police shall allow a person to 22    use the access and review process, established in the 23    Illinois State Police, for verifying that his or her 24    records relating to Minor Cannabis Offenses of the 25    Cannabis Control Act eligible under this Section have been 26    expunged.  SB1638- 51 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        (9) No conviction vacated pursuant to this Section 2    shall serve as the basis for damages for time unjustly 3    served as provided in the Court of Claims Act. 4        (10) Effect of Expungement. A person's right to 5    expunge an expungeable offense shall not be limited under 6    this Section. The effect of an order of expungement shall 7    be to restore the person to the status he or she occupied 8    before the arrest, charge, or conviction.9        (11) Information. The Illinois State Police shall post 10    general information on its website about the expungement 11    process described in this subsection (i). 12    (j) Felony Prostitution Convictions.13        (1) Any individual may file a motion to vacate and 14    expunge a conviction for a prior Class 4 felony violation 15    of prostitution. Motions to vacate and expunge under this 16    subsection (j) may be filed with the circuit court, Chief 17    Judge of a judicial circuit, or any judge of the circuit 18    designated by the Chief Judge. When considering the motion 19    to vacate and expunge, a court shall consider the 20    following:21            (A) the reasons to retain the records provided by 22        law enforcement;23            (B) the petitioner's age;24            (C) the petitioner's age at the time of offense; 25        and26            (D) the time since the conviction, and the   SB1638- 52 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1        specific adverse consequences if denied. An individual 2        may file the petition after the completion of any 3        sentence or condition imposed by the conviction. 4        Within 60 days of the filing of the motion, a State's 5        Attorney may file an objection to the petition along 6        with supporting evidence. If a motion to vacate and 7        expunge is granted, the records shall be expunged in 8        accordance with subparagraph (d)(9)(A) of this 9        Section. An agency providing civil legal aid, as 10        defined in Section 15 of the Public Interest Attorney 11        Assistance Act, assisting individuals seeking to file 12        a motion to vacate and expunge under this subsection 13        may file motions to vacate and expunge with the Chief 14        Judge of a judicial circuit or any judge of the circuit 15        designated by the Chief Judge, and the motion may 16        include more than one individual.17        (2) Any State's Attorney may file a motion to vacate 18    and expunge a conviction for a Class 4 felony violation of 19    prostitution. Motions to vacate and expunge under this 20    subsection (j) may be filed with the circuit court, Chief 21    Judge of a judicial circuit, or any judge of the circuit 22    court designated by the Chief Judge, and may include more 23    than one individual. When considering the motion to vacate 24    and expunge, a court shall consider the following reasons:25            (A) the reasons to retain the records provided by 26        law enforcement;  SB1638- 53 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1            (B) the petitioner's age;2            (C) the petitioner's age at the time of offense;3            (D) the time since the conviction; and4            (E) the specific adverse consequences if denied.5        If the State's Attorney files a motion to vacate and 6    expunge records for felony prostitution convictions 7    pursuant to this Section, the State's Attorney shall 8    notify the Prisoner Review Board within 30 days of the 9    filing. If a motion to vacate and expunge is granted, the 10    records shall be expunged in accordance with subparagraph 11    (d)(9)(A) of this Section.12        (3) In the public interest, the State's Attorney of a 13    county has standing to file motions to vacate and expunge 14    pursuant to this Section in the circuit court with 15    jurisdiction over the underlying conviction.16        (4) The Illinois State Police shall allow a person to 17    a use the access and review process, established in the 18    Illinois State Police, for verifying that his or her 19    records relating to felony prostitution eligible under 20    this Section have been expunged.21        (5) No conviction vacated pursuant to this Section 22    shall serve as the basis for damages for time unjustly 23    served as provided in the Court of Claims Act.24        (6) Effect of Expungement. A person's right to expunge 25    an expungeable offense shall not be limited under this 26    Section. The effect of an order of expungement shall be to   SB1638- 54 -LRB104 10281 RTM 20355 b1    restore the person to the status he or she occupied before 2    the arrest, charge, or conviction.3        (7) Information. The Illinois State Police shall post 4    general information on its website about the expungement 5    process described in this subsection (j).6(Source: P.A. 102-145, eff. 7-23-21; 102-558, 8-20-21; 7102-639, eff. 8-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-933, eff. 81-1-23; 103-35, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-609, 9eff. 7-1-24; 103-755, eff. 8-2-24; revised 8-9-24.)